zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 无障碍与移动辅助用品: 无障碍设备; 辅助设备配件; 无障碍家具及附属装置; 助行器配件; 助行器具
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Artykuły dla osób mających trudności z poruszaniem się: Sprzęt ułatwiający poruszanie się; Akcesoria do sprzętu ułatwiającego poruszanie się; Meble i armatura ułatwiające poruszanie się; Akcesoria do pomocy ułatwiających chodzenie; Pomoce ułatwiające chodzenie
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Omezená pohyblivost a bezbariérový přístup: Pomůcky pro invalidy; Pomůcky pro invalidy – příslušenství; Nábytek a příslušenství pro osoby s handicapem; Pomůcky k chůzi – příslušenství; Berle, hole a chodítka
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Мобилност и помощни средства: Помощни средства; Аксесоари за помощни средства; Помощни мебели и стойки за захват; Аксесоари за помощни средства за ходене; Помощни средства за ходене
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Senioren- & Behindertenbedarf: Zubehör & Bedarf zur Barrierefreiheit; Zubehör für Behindertengerechte Möbel & Vorrichtungen; Behindertengerechte Möbel & Vorrichtungen; Gehhilfenzubehör; Gehhilfen
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 無障礙行動力: 無障礙設施; 無障礙設施配件; 無障礙家具和設備; 行走輔助器配件; 行走輔具
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Mobilitás és hozzáférhetőség: Kisegítő berendezések; Kisegítőberendezés-kiegészítők; Kisegítő bútorok és berendezési tárgyak; Járást segítő kiegészítők; Járássegítők
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Mobilità e accessibilità: Ausili accessibilità; Accessori ausili accessibilità; Mobili e impianti per accessibilità; Accessori di ausilio alla deambulazione; Ausili per la deambulazione
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Mobilitet og tilgjengelighet: Tilgjengelighetsutstyr; Tilbehør til tilgjengelighetsutstyr; Tilgjengelighetsmøbler og -utstyr; Tilbehør til ganghjelpemidler; Ganghjelpemidler
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Mobilidade e acessibilidade: Equipamento de acessibilidade; Acessórios de equipamento de acessibilidade; Fixações e mobiliário de acessibilidade; Acessórios de auxílio à marcha; Auxílios à marcha
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Rörlighet och tillgänglighet: Hjälpmedel för tillgänglighet; Tillbehör till tillgänglighetsutrustning; Möbler och inredning för tillgänglighet; Tillbehör för gånghjälpmedel; Gånghjälpmedel
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Movilidad y accesibilidad: Equipo de accesibilidad; Accesorios para equipos de accesibilidad; Accesorios y muebles adaptados; Accesorios para utensilios para andar; Utensilios para andar
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Mobiliteit en toegankelijkheid: Toegankelijkheidsapparatuur; Accessoires voor toegankelijkheidsapparatuur; Meubelen en steunen voor toegankelijkheid; Accessoires voor loophulpen; Loophulpmiddelen
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 移動補助具・生活補助具: 生活補助具; 生活補助具関連用品; 生活補助用家具・取付金具; 歩行補助具関連用品; 歩行補助用品
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > การเคลื่อนไหวและการเข้าถึง: เครื่องมือสำหรับการเข้าถึงพิเศษ; อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือสำหรับการเข้าถึงพิเศษ; เฟอร์นิเจอร์และเครื่องเรือนสำหรับการเข้าถึงพิเศษ; อุปกรณ์ช่วยเดิน; ที่ช่วยเดิน
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Mobilita a dostupnosť: Vybavenie pre bezbariérový prístup; Príslušenstvo k vybaveniu pre bezbariérový prístup; Bezbariérový nábytok a príslušenstvo; Príslušenstvo k pomôckam pri chôdzi; Pomôcky pri chôdzi
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Mobility & Accessibility: Accessibility Equipment; Accessibility Equipment Accessories; Accessibility Furniture & Fixtures; Walking Aid Accessories; Walking Aids
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Sản phẩm hỗ trợ khả năng di chuyển và tiếp cận: Thiết bị hỗ trợ khả năng tiếp cận; Phụ kiện thiết bị hỗ trợ khả năng tiếp cận; Trang thiết bị hỗ trợ người khuyết tật; Phụ kiện dụng cụ hỗ trợ đi lại; Thiết bị hỗ trợ đi lại
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Bevægelighed og mobilitet: Mobilitetsudstyr; Tilbehør til mobilitetsudstyr; Møbler og armaturer til mobilitetsudstyr; Tilbehør til ganghjælpemidler; Ganghjælpemidler
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Mobilnost in dostopnost: Oprema za osebe s posebnimi potrebami; Dodatki za opremo za osebe s posebnimi potrebami; Pohištvo in oprema za osebe s posebnimi potrebami; Dodatki za pomoč pri hoji; Pripomočki za hojo
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Liikkuminen ja esteettömyys: Liikkumisen apuvälineet; Liikkumisen apuvälineiden lisätarvikkeet; Apukalusteet ja tuet; Kävelyn apuvälineiden lisätarvikkeet; Kävelyapu
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 이동/사용 편의: 사용 편의 장비; 사용 편의 장비 부대용품; 사용 편의용 가구/설비; 보행 보조기 부대용품; 보행 보조기
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Mobilitate și accesibilitate: Echipamente de accesibilitate; Accesorii pentru echipamente de accesibilitate; Mobilier și accesorii pentru accesibilitate; Accesorii pentru dispozitive ajutătoare de mers; Dispozitive ajutătoare pentru mers
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Mobilite ve Kolay Erişim: Erişim Ekipmanları; Kolay Erişim Ekipmanı Aksesuarları; Kolay Erişim Mobilya ve Demirbaşları; Yürüme Yardımcısı Aksesuarları; Yürüme Yardımcıları
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Κινητικότητα & προσβασιμότητα: Εξοπλισμός προσβασιμότητας; Αξεσουάρ εξοπλισμού προσβασιμότητας; Έπιπλα & εξαρτήματα προσβασιμότητας; Αξεσουάρ βοηθημάτων για το περπάτημα; Βοηθήματα βάδισης
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Обеспечения мобильности людей: Оборудование для маломобильных людей; Аксессуары для оборудования для маломобильных людей; Мебель и приспособления для маломобильных людей; Аксессуары для вспомогательных приспособлений для ходьбы; Вспомогательные приспособления для ходьбы
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Mobilité et accessibilité: Matériel d’accessibilité; Accessoires pour matériel d’accessibilité; Meubles et supports d’accessibilité; Accessoires pour l’aide à la marche; Aides à la marche
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Mobilidade e acessibilidade: Equipamento de acessibilidade; Acessórios para equipamento de acessibilidade; Móveis e utensílios de acessibilidade; Acessórios de auxílio para locomoção; Auxílios para locomoção
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Mobilumas ir pritaikymas neįgaliesiems: Pritaikymo neįgaliesiems įranga; Pritaikymo neįgaliesiems įrangos priedai; Pritaikymo neįgaliesiems baldai ir instaliacijos; Pagalbinių vaikščiojimo priemonių priedai; Pagalbinės vaikščiojimo priemonės
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Mobilnost i pristupačnost: Oprema za pristupačnost; Pribor za opremu za pristupačnost; Namještaj i instalacije za pristupačnost; Pribor za pomagala za hodanje; Pomagala za hodanje